Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 3023.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3023.4. A. It shall be the duty of the Department of
Labor to develop an enforcement program which will ensure compliance
with regulations and requirements referenced in this chapter. An
enforcement program may include, but is not limited to, regulations
for identification of property locations which are subject to the
regulations and requirements; issuing notifications to violating
property owners or operators; random on-site inspections and tests
on existing installations; witnessing periodic inspections and
testing in order to ensure satisfactory performance by licensed
persons, sole proprietors, firms or corporations; and assisting in
the development of public awareness programs. The Department shall
not retroactively apply new rules and standards to existing
structures unless the Department produces written findings,
supported by documented evidence, that the structure presents
obvious safety hazards.
B. Any person may request an investigation into an alleged
violation of this chapter by giving notice to the Department of
Labor of such violation or danger. The notice shall be in writing,

shall set forth with reasonable particularity the grounds for the
notice, and shall be signed by the person making the request.
C. Upon receipt of a notification, if the Commissioner
determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a
violation or danger exists, the Commissioner shall cause to be made
an investigation in accordance with this chapter as soon as
practicable to determine if such violation or danger exists. If the
Commissioner determines that there are no reasonable grounds to
believe that a violation or danger exists, the Department of Labor
shall notify the party in writing of such determination.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4321 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4321 Page 3